test/src/morphology/N-kanarik43_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kanarik: # Noun (43) kanarik 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kanarik+N+Sg+Nom: kanarik
     kanarik+N+Sg+Gen: kanarigu
     kanarik+N+Sg+Par: kanarikku
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ill: kanarikku
     kanarik+N+Pl+Gen: [kanarikkõ, kanarikka]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Par: [kanarikkõ, kanarikka]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ill: [kanarikkõhe, kanarikkõ, kanarikkahe, kanarikka]
     kanarik+N+Pl+All: [kanarigõlõ, kanarigalõ]
